Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.305

Motor homes.

"Motor homes" means motor vehicles originally designed, reconstructed, or permanently altered to provide facilities for human habitation, which include lodging and cooking or sewage disposal, and is enclosed within a solid body shell with the vehicle, but excludes a camper or like unit constructed separately and affixed to a motor vehicle.

[ 1990 c 250 s 19; 1971 ex.s. c 231 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 231: See note following RCW 46.01.130.